Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1

General Provisions

37-5-101. Creation of department — Division of juvenile justice — Deputy commissioner of juvenile justice — Powers and duties — Funding.

There is hereby created the department of children's services.

Within the department, there is created a division of juvenile justice to serve children who are adjudicated delinquent.

The deputy commissioner of juvenile justice shall be appointed to lead the division of juvenile justice and shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. The commissioner shall appoint a person qualified by training and experience in the area of juvenile justice to perform the duties of deputy commissioner of juvenile justice. The appointee must be a graduate of an accredited college or university and be experienced in the field of juvenile justice.

It is the duty and responsibility of the division of juvenile justice to serve children who are adjudicated delinquent. The deputy commissioner shall have the powers and duties that the commissioner shall prescribe, in order to effectively administer, develop and oversee all state programs and services for delinquent children, their families and their communities.

The commissioner shall earmark a sum sufficient to be used exclusively for the division of juvenile justice. This budget shall include all appropriations for residential and nonresidential services provided for the prevention of delinquency and the rehabilitation, treatment and training of delinquent youth.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 2; 2006, ch. 818, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The department of children's services, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

For additional provisions relating to the termination of the department of children's services, see the Compiler's Notes under §4-3-101.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 184 provided:

“Any provision of this act, or the application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.”

Cross-References. Creation of the department of children's services, 4-3-101.

37-5-102. Purpose.

Through the department of children's services, the state of Tennessee, in cooperation with juvenile courts, local communities, schools and families will strive to provide timely, appropriate and cost-effective services for children in state custody and at risk of entering state custody so that these children can reach their full potential as productive, competent and healthy adults. The department is created to provide services to those children who are unruly, delinquent, dependent and neglected, and their respective families, as well as for children who are at imminent risk and in need of services to prevent entry into state custody, who are in state custody pending family reunification or other permanent placement, or as otherwise may be required for such children and their families pursuant to state law. In all cases, the services shall be to further the best interest of the child, and when appropriate, to preserve the relationship between the child and the family. Whenever possible, the services shall be provided in the community where the child lives and in a setting that is the least restrictive and, yet, the most beneficial to the child. For the children it serves, the department shall strive to:

Protect children from abuse, mistreatment or neglect;

Provide prevention, early intervention, rehabilitative and educational services;

Pursue appropriate and effective behavioral and mental health treatment;

Ensure that health care needs, both preventive and practical, are met; and

Keep children safe.

The department will work to preserve the safety and protect the standards in Tennessee communities through efforts to combat delinquency and other social ills concerning young people. The department shall work to continuously improve the management and coordination of services for the children and families of Tennessee identified in this section by ensuring thorough evaluations and assessments, appropriate and effective service delivery, timely permanency planning and supportive supervision and monitoring of the progress of children discharged from state custody.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 3; 2008, ch. 1044, § 1; 2012, ch. 831, § 1, 2; 2015, ch. 242, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “the focus of” following “In all cases” near the beginning of the third sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 242, § 2. April 24, 2015.

37-5-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abuse” exists when a person under eighteen (18) years of age is suffering from, has sustained or may be in immediate danger of suffering from or sustaining a wound, injury, disability or physical or mental condition caused by brutality, neglect or other actions or inactions of a parent, relative, guardian or caretaker;

“Adjudication of delinquency” means that a juvenile court has found beyond a reasonable doubt that a child has committed a delinquent act, as defined in § 37-1-102, that is an act designated a crime under the law, including local ordinances of this state, or of another state if the act occurred in that state, or under federal law, and the crime does not fall under § 37-1-102(b)(32)(C) and the crime is not a traffic offense as defined in the traffic code of the state other than failing to stop when involved in an accident pursuant to § 55-10-101, driving while under the influence of an intoxicant or drug, vehicular homicide or any other traffic offense classified as a felony;

“Adult” means, as defined in § 37-1-102, any person eighteen (18) years of age or older;

“Child” means:

A person under eighteen (18) years of age; or

A person under nineteen (19) years of age for the limited purpose of:

Remaining under the continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile court to enforce a non-custodial order of disposition entered prior to the person's eighteenth birthday;

Remaining under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for the purpose of being committed, or completing commitment including completion of home placement supervision, to the department with such commitment based on an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that occurred prior to the person's eighteenth birthday; or

Remaining under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for resolution of delinquent offense(s) committed prior to a person's eighteenth birthday but considered by the juvenile court after a person's eighteenth birthday with the court having the option of retaining jurisdiction for adjudication and disposition or transferring the person to criminal court under § 37-1-134;

In no event shall a person eighteen (18) years of age or older be committed to or remain in the custody of the department of children's services by virtue of being adjudicated dependent and neglected, unruly, or in need of services pursuant to §37-1-175, except as provided in § 37-5-106(a)(20);

This subdivision (4) shall in no way be construed as limiting the court's jurisdiction to transfer a person to criminal court under §37-1-134;

A person eighteen (18) years of age is legally an adult for all other purposes including, but not limited to, enforcement of the court's orders under this subdivision (4) through its contempt power under §37-1-158;

No exception shall be made for a child who may be emancipated by marriage or otherwise;

(A) “Child sexual abuse” means, as defined in §37-1-602, the commission of any act involving the unlawful sexual abuse, molestation, fondling or carnal knowledge of a child under thirteen (13) years of age that, prior to November 1, 1989, constituted the criminal offense of:

Aggravated rape under §39-2-603 [repealed];

Rape under §39-2-604 [repealed];

Aggravated sexual battery under §39-2-606 [repealed];

Sexual battery under §39-2-607 [repealed];

Assault with intent to commit rape or attempt to commit rape or sexual battery under §39-2-608 [repealed];

Crimes against nature under §39-2-612 [repealed];

Incest under §39-4-306 [repealed];

Begetting child on wife's sister under §39-4-307 [repealed];

Use of minor for obscene purposes under §39-6-1137 [repealed]; or

Promotion of performance including sexual conduct by minor under §39-6-1138 [repealed];

“Child sexual abuse” also means the commission of any act involving the unlawful sexual abuse, molestation, fondling or carnal knowledge of a child under the age of thirteen (13) that on or after November 1, 1989, constituted the criminal offense of:

Aggravated rape under §39-13-502;

Rape under §39-13-503;

Aggravated sexual battery under §39-13-504;

Sexual battery under §39-13-505;

Rape of a child under §39-13-522;

Criminal attempt as provided in §39-12-101 for any of the offenses listed above;

Incest under §39-15-302;

Sexual exploitation of a minor under §39-17-1003;

Aggravated sexual exploitation of a minor under §39-17-1004; or

Especially aggravated sexual exploitation of a minor under §39-17-1005;

“Child sexual abuse” also means one (1) or more of the following acts:

Any penetration, however slight, of the vagina or anal opening of one person by the penis of another person, whether or not there is the emission of semen;

Any contact between the genitals or anal opening of one person and the mouth or tongue of another person;

Any intrusion by one person into the genitals or anal opening of another person, including the use of any object for this purpose, except that it shall not include acts intended for a valid medical purpose;

The intentional touching of the genitals or intimate parts, including the breasts, genital area, groin, inner thighs and buttocks, or the clothing covering them, of either the child or the perpetrator, except that it shall not include:

Acts that may reasonably be construed to be normal caretaker responsibilities, interactions with, or affection for a child; or

Acts intended for a valid medical purpose;

The intentional exposure of the perpetrator's genitals in the presence of a child, or any other sexual act intentionally perpetrated in the presence of a child, if such exposure or sexual act is for the purpose of sexual arousal or gratification, aggression, degradation or other similar purpose; or

The sexual exploitation of a child, which includes allowing, encouraging or forcing a child to:

Solicit for or engage in prostitution; or

Engage in an act prohibited by §39-17-1003;

For the purposes of the reporting, investigation and treatment provisions of §§37-1-603 —37-1-615, “child sexual abuse” also means the commission of any act specified in subdivisions (5)(A)-(C) against a child thirteen (13) years of age through seventeen (17) years of age if such act is committed against the child by a parent, guardian, relative, person residing in the child's home or other person responsible for the care and custody of the child;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of children's services;

“Department” means the department of children's services;

“Dependent and neglected” means, as defined in §37-1-102, a child:

Who is without a parent, guardian or legal custodian;

Whose parent, guardian or person with whom the child lives, by reason of cruelty, mental incapacity, immorality or depravity, is unfit to properly care for such child;

Who is under unlawful or improper care, supervision, custody or restraint by any person, corporation, agency, association, institution, society or other organization or who is unlawfully kept out of school;

Whose parent, guardian or custodian neglects or refuses to provide necessary medical, surgical, institutional or hospital care for such child;

Who, because of lack of proper supervision, is found in any place the existence of which is in violation of law;

Who is in such condition of want or suffering or is under such improper guardianship or control as to injure or endanger the morals or health of such child or others;

Who is suffering from abuse or neglect;

Who has been in the care and control of an agency or person who is not related to such child by blood or marriage for a continuous period of eighteen (18) months or longer in the absence of a court order and such person or agency has not initiated judicial proceedings seeking either legal custody or adoption of the child; or

Who is or has been allowed, encouraged or permitted to engage in prostitution or obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, posing or similar activity and whose parent, guardian or other custodian neglects or refuses to protect such child from further such activity;

“Guardian” means, for purposes of adoptions and terminations of parental rights, the meanings set forth in §36-1-102 and, for all other purposes, the meaning set forth in §34-1-101;

“Imminent risk” means circumstances or behavior likely to produce, within a relatively short period of time, a reasonably strong probability that the child will be placed in state custody;

“Juvenile” means a person under eighteen (18) years of age. No exception shall be made for a child who may be emancipated by marriage or otherwise;

“Legal custodian” means a person or agency to whom legal custody of a child has been given by court order. A legal custodian has the right to physical custody of the child; the right to determine the nature of the care and treatment of the child, including ordinary medical care; and the right and duty to provide for the care, protection, training, education and physical, mental and moral welfare of the child. Such rights and duties are, however, subject to the conditions and limitations of the order granting legal custody and to the remaining rights and duties of the child's parent(s);

“Order of referral” means a juvenile court order entered prior to a child being adjudicated unruly or dependent and neglected, or prior to the disposition of a child who has been adjudicated delinquent, unruly or dependent and neglected, that directs that the department make an assessment of the child and report the findings and recommendations to the court;

“Report of harm” means a report regarding child abuse filed under §37-1-403 or a report regarding child sexual abuse filed under §37-1-605;

“Unruly” means, as defined in §37-1-102, a child in need of treatment and rehabilitation who:

Habitually and without justification is truant from school while subject to compulsory school attendance under §49-6-3007;

Habitually is disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child's parent or parents, guardian or other legal custodian to the degree that such child's health and safety are endangered;

Commits an offense that is applicable only to a child; or

Is away from the home, residence or any other residential placement of the child's parent or parents, guardian or other legal custodian without their consent. Such child shall be known and defined as a “runaway;”

“Youth development center” means a hardware secure facility that houses children who have been adjudicated delinquent and who meet the criteria as established by the department for placement at such facility.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 4; 2000, ch. 947, § 8G; 2005, ch. 265, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Subdivision (5)(D), as originally enacted by Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 4, contained a reference to “subdivisions (a)(2)(A)-(C)”; however, that act contained no (a)(2)(A)-(C). The reference has been changed to “(5)(A)-(C)” as a possible interpretation of legislative intent.

The definition in subdivision (b)(23) shall be effective July 1, 1996, before which date the definition of “unruly” shall be the definition found in former §37-1-102(b)(21), which read: “ ‘Unruly child’ means a child who: (A) While subject to compulsory school attendance is habitually and without justification truant from school; (B) Is habitually disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child's parent, guardian or other custodian, and is ungovernable; (C) Has committed an offense applicable only to a child; or (D) Is away from the home or residence of his parents or guardians without their consent. Such child shall be known and defined as a ‘runaway’; if any of the foregoing is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.”

37-5-104. Commissioner of children's services — Qualifications.

The governor shall appoint a person qualified by training and experience in the area of children's services to perform the duties of the commissioner of children's services. The appointee must be a graduate of an accredited college or university.

The commissioner shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor, and the commissioner's compensation shall be fixed by the governor and paid from the appropriation available to the department pursuant to § 8-23-101(c).

The commissioner shall have the necessary offices, equipment and supplies to carry out the duties of the office.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 5.

37-5-105. Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, has the following powers and duties in addition to such other powers and duties as may be specifically provided by law in this title or as otherwise provided by law:

Select and recommend to the appropriate state officials the employment or transfer of all personnel required for the operation of the department, except, however, the transfer of any employees pursuant to this chapter or the initial organization of the new department pursuant to this chapter shall not result in any impairment, interruption or diminution of employee rights, privileges, salary, benefits, leave accumulation or employment; and further, such transfer of employees pursuant to this chapter or initial organization of the new department pursuant to this chapter shall not result in a contract employee supervising a preferred service employee or conducting a job performance evaluation for a preferred service employee;

Recommend to the appropriate state officials the salaries and compensation of all officers and employees of the department;

Make and adopt rules, regulations and policies for the government, management and supervision of state children's service agencies or facilities, and children's services; prescribe the powers and duties of the officers and employees thereof; and provide for the care of children served by the department; provided, however, that such rules shall be consistent with and subject to licensing approval authority of any other state agency that has responsibility for licensing or approval of any portion of program services or facilities provided by the department;

Publish, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publication committee, an annual report on the operation of the department and the services and programs under its supervision by January 31 and furnish the report to the governor, members of the general assembly, other persons and relevant entities that may request the report such as the Tennessee council of juvenile and family court judges and the Tennessee commission on children and youth, and others as the governor may consider appropriate;

Such annual report shall contain information regarding foster care services, including definitions, racial composition, and statutory or regulatory authority where appropriate as to the following:

Placement Information. Total number of children in foster care by region and segmented by:

Level of placement (I-IV);

Placement type (department of children's services foster home, continuum contracts, pre-adoptive or adoptive, diagnostic shelter, emergency shelter, medical or surgical hospital, miscellaneous, specialized residential school, trial home visit);

Average length of custody; and

Number of department of children's services foster care placements currently available;

Range of social services caseload;

Social Services Caseload Information. Total social services case managers by region and segmented by:

Case manager slots;

Actual filled slots;

Average salary;

Average social services caseload; and

Legal Support by Region. Total number of attorneys and paralegal staff:

Number of attorney slots;

Number of attorney filled slots;

Number of paralegal slots; and

Number of paralegal filled slots;

Direct the placement of children in appropriate state programs or facilities, or contract programs or facilities, in conformity with constitutional, statutory or regulatory requirements;

Assume general responsibility for the proper and efficient operation of the department, its services and programs. The commissioner may establish such divisions and units within the department as necessary for its efficient operation;

Promulgate necessary rules and regulations to govern administrative searches and inspections of employees of the department, juveniles in the custody of the department and visitors to facilities of the department. Such rules shall provide guidelines and standards for the manner in which the searches authorized by this subdivision (7) shall be conducted;

Promulgate rules and regulations concerning drug testing that are not inconsistent with the provisions of §41-1-121;

(A) Conduct investigations as deemed necessary to the performance of the commissioner's duties, and to that end, the commissioner shall have the same power as a judge of the court of general sessions to administer oaths and to enforce the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books and papers;

The commissioner shall keep a record of such investigations, stating the time, place, nature or subject, witnesses summoned and examined, and the commissioner's conclusions;

In matters involving the conduct of an office, a stenographic report of the evidence may be taken and a copy thereof with all documents introduced kept on file at the office of the department;

The fees of witnesses for attendance and travel shall be the same as in the circuit court, but no officer or employee of the institution under investigation shall be entitled thereto;

Any judge of the circuit or chancery court, either in term time or in vacation, upon application of the commissioner, may compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of books or papers and the giving of testimony before the commissioner, by a judgment for contempt or otherwise, in the same manner as in the cases before a circuit or chancery court;

(A) The commissioner shall have the authority to conduct or cause to be conducted any administrative hearings relating to any factual determinations that the department is authorized or required to make pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, or pursuant to any other hearing procedures required by law or that may be necessary to provide due process procedures for individuals affected by the programs administered by the department;

The commissioner, or any officer or employee of the department upon written authorization from the commissioner, has the power to administer oath and affirmations, take depositions, issue subpoenas and require the production of documents and any books and records that may be necessary in the conduct of such hearings;

Perform all duties and exercise all authority set forth in part 3 of this chapter, regarding community services agencies;

(A) Establish a children's services advisory council having fifteen (15) members appointed by the commissioner to act in an advisory capacity on any matter within the jurisdiction of the department. Appointees to the council shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of local law enforcement, mental health professionals, local education agencies, juvenile court officials, social workers, health care providers, consumers of services such as parents, foster parents or family members of children who are or have been recipients of services from the department, child advocates, persons having specialized knowledge or experience and public and private agencies that provide services to children. The members of the council shall be appointed with a conscious intention of reflecting a diverse mixture with respect to race and gender. Each community services agency region shall be represented by at least one (1) individual on the council;

The term of a member of the children's services advisory council shall be three (3) years with the terms staggered so as to replace no more than one third (1/3) of the members each year. Members of the council may be reappointed after their terms expire. Members of the council shall continue in office until the expiration of the terms for which they were respectively appointed and until such time as their successors are appointed. Vacancies occurring on the council by reasons of death or resignation shall be filled in the same manner as a regular appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term;

Members shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses for attending meetings of the council. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter;

The duties of the council shall be to advise the commissioner regarding issues pertaining to the purpose of the department and its work when requested by the commissioner. Annually, the council shall elect one (1) of its members to serve as chair of the council and one (1) member to serve as secretary. Minutes of each meeting shall be kept and sent to the commissioner. Any officer may be elected to consecutive terms;

Establish, from time to time, committees composed of representatives from the public or private sectors, or both, for such purposes and durations as may be deemed appropriate or required by the commissioner. Members of such committees shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses for attending meetings of their respective committees. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter;

(A) Establish and administer, jointly with the state treasurer, a scholarship program for the sole purpose of providing financial assistance to foster children wishing to pursue opportunities in higher education;

The scholarship program established and administered pursuant to subdivision (14)(A) shall be funded from state appropriations and from such individual and corporate grants, donations and contributions as the commissioner shall solicit and receive specifically for such purpose;

In consultation with the child sexual abuse task force established by §37-1-603(b)(1), the child advocacy centers, the Tennessee council of juvenile and family court judges, the Tennessee commission on children and youth, the Tennessee supreme court administrative office of the court, the district attorneys general conference and the juvenile and criminal court clerks, develop a plan and recommendations regarding requirements for extensive, detailed information regarding all reports of child maltreatment and the criminal, civil or administrative disposition of all allegations, by type, of child maltreatment and, by type, of disposition, including data regarding the victims and the perpetrators, to be collected by the department and submit the plan and recommendations to the judiciary committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families. Any child-specific information shall be confidential, except as otherwise provided by statute;

Promote collaboration and accountability among local, public, and private programs to improve the lives of children and families, including continuing accreditation with the Council on Accreditation for Children and Family Services, Inc. or its equivalent, to develop strategies consistent with best practice standards for delivery of services. If the department fails to maintain accreditation, a report shall be provided to the general assembly outlining the reasons the department is no longer accredited; and

(A) Report to the governor, the chief clerk of the senate, and the chief clerk of the house of representatives on probation and juvenile justice evidence-based treatment services by January 31 of each year for the previous fiscal year;

Such report shall contain the following:

Probation information:

The number of children served by state probation;

The number of children served by county probation as reported to the department in §37-1-506(b);

The average daily cost per child served by state probation;

Custodial information:

The total number of children in juvenile justice placements;

The number of children placed in youth development centers;

The number of children placed in community placements;

The average daily cost per child placed in a community placement; and

The average daily cost per child placed in a youth development center;

Recidivism and system penetration information:

The number of children receiving probation services who entered state custody;

The recidivism rate for children receiving state probation services;

The recidivism rate for children receiving county probation services;

The recidivism rate for children not receiving probation services; and

The recidivism rate for children receiving any probation services; and

Evidence-based services information:

The number of children receiving evidence-based treatment services;

The percentage of treatment services that are evidence-based;

The number of children receiving prevention services;

The number of children receiving evidence-based prevention services; and

A list of juvenile courts receiving prevention grants or other prevention funding from the department, the amount of funding received, and the percentage of funding being used for evidence-based prevention services.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 6; 1999, ch. 508, § 5; 1999, ch. 521, §§ 1-3; 2001, ch. 401, § 2; 2006, ch. 890, § 4; 2010, ch. 1044, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(r); 2012, ch. 800, § 49; 2013, ch. 236, § 82; 2016, ch. 1005, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 43.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 508, § 12 provided that the department of children's services shall report at least once every sixty (60) days, or as often as requested, to the Special Joint Task Force to study foster care; the general welfare, health and human resources committee of the senate; the health and human resources committee of the house of representatives; the children and family affairs committee of the house of representatives; and the select joint committee on children and youth. Such periodic reports shall describe the current implementation status of the various provisions of this act.

Acts 2001, ch. 401, § 4, provided that the amendment to this section by the act, which amended subdivision (4)(A), shall apply to any investigation or any civil cause of action pending or filed on or after June 19, 2001.

Acts 2006, ch. 890, § 1 provided that the provisions of the act, which added subdivision (15), may be collectively known as the “Child Protection Act of 2006.”

For the Preamble to the act concerning the Tennessee department of children's services accreditation from the Council on Accreditation for Children and Family Services, Inc., please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 1044.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (1), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (17).

The 2019 amendment substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” for “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” in (15).

Effective Dates. Act 2016, ch. 1005, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.